Hawaii, session 2026, GM1332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that, pursuant to Senate
Concurrent Resolution No. 81, H.D. 1 (2018), a working group
submitted to the 2019 legislature a report examining how the
department of education could maximize medicaid reimbursements
for support services offered to eligible students, specifically
to special education youth having severe mental health
conditions.
The legislature believes that, given the critical
importance of providing all students with a quality public
education, further oversight and an updated plan are needed to
ensure that the department of education continues to maximize
medicaid reimbursements for administrative and support services
for students with special needs.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the
department of education to provide:
2026-2526 SB3325 CDl SMA.docx 1
MlillHHHHDinillliWIH

S.B. NO. S',
C.D. 1
(1) An updated plan to maximize medicaid reimbursements
for administrative and support services for students
with special needs; and
(2) Annual reports on the status of the plan's
implementation.
SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§302A- Medicaid reimbursement for administrative and
support services; students with special needs; reporting
requirements. (a) The department shall establish an updated
plan to maximize medicaid reimbursements for administrative and
support services provided to students with special needs. The
department may amend the plan as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.
(b) The department, in consultation with the med-QUEST
division of the department of human services, shall submit a
report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
conyening of each^^2ula^sessi^on joroyidiuig the st^tus^f y2e
department's plan and efforts pursuant to subsection (a). The
report shall include;
2026-2526 SB3325 CDl SMA.docx
niBDHiiiiiimiiiiiiHiiiii

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) A copy of the plan established pursuant to
subsection (a) and the status of the plan's
implementation;
(2) A detailed explanation of how the following medicaid
claim requirements shall be met:
Service documentation for the individualized
education programs of applicable students;
(B) Confirmation of a student's medicaid eligibility;
(C) Records of completed parental consent forms;
(D) Documentation indicating that all reported
services provided are appropriate, medically
necessary, and covered by med-QUEST, in addition
to any other details required for services
provided; and
(E) Documentation substantiating that any medicaid
reimbursable service provided was delivered by a
licensed and medicaid-enrolled provider or by
£ele£t£rofessiona ls under the su£eryision of a
licensed provider;
(3) Training materials and evidence of successful training
on medicaid reimbursable school-based services rules
2026-2526 SB3325 CDl SMA.docx
IMIIIUIIMIIIinillllHIM

Page 4
S.B. NO.
2^1
C.D. 1
and requirements for department staff, including the
assistant superintendent for the office of student
support services, educational director of the
exceptional support branch of the office of student
support services, district education specialists,
student services coordinators, teachers, and
providers;
(4) Detailed information on the department's procedures
for identifying the medically necessary needs of
special education students, and, if eligible for
medicaid reimbursement, the complete process of
pursuing reimbursement;
An evaluation of the department's progress in
implementing the updated plan, including monthly
indicators of the total;
(A) Number of students served, classified by complex
area;
(B) Amount of medicaid reimbursement received for
direct services, classified by complex area, and
administrative services statewide; and
2026-2526 SB3325 CDl SMA.docx 4
limiMIffllllllNIIIIIIIIIIM

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(C) Amount of federal reimbursement leveraged for
eligible services, including both direct service
claims and administrative claims, classified by
complex area; and
(6) Information detailing how reimbursement moneys are
being reinvested.”
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2526 SB3325 CDl SMA.docx 5
imiiiMiiniiiiiMi

S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 10th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3325, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
236-26

SB No. 3325, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
-----------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives